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Skid Control ECUDeceleration Sensor
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DTC C1336 / 39 Zero Point Calibration of Deceleration
Sensor Undone

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1236 / 39

When any of following 1. through 2. is detected:
1. In TEST mode, the shift lever is shifted to other then P

range with 2 sec. after ECU terminal IG1 is turned ON
for the first time.

2. When the deceleration sensor zero point recorded in
ECU is deleted.

S Deceleration sensor
S Deceleration sensor circuit
S Neutral start switch circuit (R range)

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Perform zero point calibration of the yaw rate (deceleration) sensor (See page
DI−1 85).
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2 Is DTC still output?

Check DTC on page DI−185.

NO End.

YES

3 Check yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b)ConnectVYSterminal to thebatteries’positive (+) termi-

nal,andGYAWterminal to thebatteries’negative ( −) ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-
nals.

NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and
GYAW.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the
sensor is tilted forward and rearward.
OK:

Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL1 Leanrearward 1.0V − about2.3V

GL1 Lean forward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL2 Leanrearward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Lean forward 1.0V − about2.3V

HINT:
S If thesensor is tilted toomuch itmayshowthewrongval-

ue.
S If dropped, thesensorshouldbe replacedwithanewone.
S The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be

placed upside down.

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK
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4 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


